Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1604
Monopolies and attempted monopolies; unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to monopolize, or attempt to monopolize or combine or conspire with any other person or persons to monopolize any part of trade or commerce.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 11.

As related to a course of action for any person injured in violation of this section, section 59-1609 contemplates an action by indirect purchasers. Arthur v. Microsoft Corp., 267 Neb. 586, 676 N.W.2d 29 (2004).

This section allows any person who is injured by a violation of sections 59-1602 to 59-1606 which directly or indirectly affects the people of Nebraska to bring a civil action to recover damages. Arthur v. Microsoft Corp., 267 Neb. 586, 676 N.W.2d 29 (2004).